test/src/morphology/V-olema_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - olema: # Verb 'to be' - full paradigm
    # according to Eesti keele käsiraamat
    # http://www.eki.ee/books/ekk09/
    # -----------------------------------------
    # indicative mood
    # present tense
    #
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:        olen
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:        oled
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:        on
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:        oleme
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:        olete
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:        on
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+4:          ollakse
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+ConNeg: ole
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+ConNeg: ole
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+ConNeg: ole
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+ConNeg: ole
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+ConNeg: ole
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: ole
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+4+ConNeg:   olda
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+ConNeg: pole
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+ConNeg: pole
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+ConNeg: pole
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+ConNeg: pole
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+ConNeg: pole
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: pole
    olema+V+Ind+Prs+4+ConNeg:   polda
    # indicative mood
    # past tense
    #
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:        olin
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:        olid
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:        oli
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:        olime
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:        olite
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:        olid
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+4:          oldi
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1+ConNeg: olnud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2+ConNeg: olnud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+ConNeg: olnud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1+ConNeg: olnud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2+ConNeg: olnud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3+ConNeg: olnud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+4+ConNeg:   oldud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1+ConNeg: polnud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2+ConNeg: polnud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+ConNeg: polnud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1+ConNeg: polnud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2+ConNeg: polnud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3+ConNeg: polnud
    olema+V+Ind+Prt+4+ConNeg:   poldud
    # conditional mood
    # present tense
    #
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1:        oleksin
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2:        oleksid
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3:        oleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1:        oleksime
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2:        oleksite
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3:        oleksid
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+4:          oldaks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1+ConNeg: oleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2+ConNeg: oleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3+ConNeg: oleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1+ConNeg: oleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2+ConNeg: oleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: oleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+4+ConNeg:   oldaks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1+ConNeg: poleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2+ConNeg: poleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3+ConNeg: poleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1+ConNeg: poleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2+ConNeg: poleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: poleks
    olema+V+Cond+Prs+4+ConNeg:   poldaks
    # conditional mood
    # past tense
    #
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+Sg1:        olnuksin
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+Sg2:        olnuksid
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+Sg3:        olnuks
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+Pl1:        olnuksime
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+Pl2:        olnuksite
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+Pl3:        olnuksid
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+4:          olduks
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+Sg1+ConNeg: olnuks
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+Sg2+ConNeg: olnuks
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+Sg3+ConNeg: olnuks
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+Pl1+ConNeg: olnuks
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+Pl2+ConNeg: olnuks
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+Pl3+ConNeg: olnuks
    olema+V+Cond+Prt+4+ConNeg:   olduks
    # imperative mood
    #
    olema+V+Imprt+Sg2:       ole
    olema+V+Imprt+Sg3:       olgu
    olema+V+Imprt+Pl1:       olgem
    olema+V+Imprt+Pl2:       olge
    olema+V+Imprt+Pl3:       olgu
    olema+V+Imprt+4:         oldagu
    olema+V+Imprt+Sg2+ConNeg: ole
    olema+V+Imprt+Sg3+ConNeg: olgu
    olema+V+Imprt+Pl1+ConNeg: olgem
    olema+V+Imprt+Pl2+ConNeg: olge
    olema+V+Imprt+Pl3+ConNeg: olgu
    olema+V+Imprt+4+ConNeg:   oldagu
    olema+V+Imprt+Sg2+ConNeg: pole
    olema+V+Imprt+Sg3+ConNeg: polgu
    olema+V+Imprt+Pl1+ConNeg: polgem
    olema+V+Imprt+Pl2+ConNeg: polge
    olema+V+Imprt+Pl3+ConNeg: polgu
    olema+V+Imprt+4+ConNeg:   poldagu
    # oblique mood (quotative)
    # present tense
    #
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Sg1:        olevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Sg2:        olevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Sg3:        olevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Pl1:        olevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Pl2:        olevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Pl3:        olevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+4:          oldavat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Sg1+ConNeg: olevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Sg2+ConNeg: olevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Sg3+ConNeg: olevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Pl1+ConNeg: olevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Pl2+ConNeg: olevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: olevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+4+ConNeg:   oldavat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Sg1+ConNeg: polevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Sg2+ConNeg: polevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Sg3+ConNeg: polevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Pl1+ConNeg: polevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Pl2+ConNeg: polevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: polevat
    olema+V+Quo+Prs+4+ConNeg:   poldavat
    # oblique mood (quotative)
    # past tense
    #
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Sg1:        olnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Sg2:        olnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Sg3:        olnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Pl1:        olnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Pl2:        olnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Pl3:        olnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+4:          oldanuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Sg1+ConNeg: olnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Sg2+ConNeg: olnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Sg3+ConNeg: olnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Pl1+ConNeg: olnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Pl2+ConNeg: olnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Pl3+ConNeg: olnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+4+ConNeg:   oldanuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Sg1+ConNeg: polnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Sg2+ConNeg: polnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Sg3+ConNeg: polnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Pl1+ConNeg: polnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Pl2+ConNeg: polnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+Pl3+ConNeg: polnuvat
    olema+V+Quo+Prt+4+ConNeg:   poldanuvat
    # jussive mood
    # present tense
    #
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+Sg1:        olgu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+Sg2:        olgu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+Sg3:        olgu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+Pl1:        olgu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+Pl2:        olgu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+Pl3:        olgu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+4:          oldagu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+Sg1+ConNeg: olgu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+Sg2+ConNeg: olgu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+Sg3+ConNeg: olgu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+Pl1+ConNeg: olgu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+Pl2+ConNeg: olgu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: olgu
    olema+V+Jus+Prs+4+ConNeg:   oldagu
    # jussive mood
    # past tense
    #
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Sg1:        olnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Sg2:        olnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Sg3:        olnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Pl1:        olnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Pl2:        olnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Pl3:        olnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+4:          oldud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Sg1+ConNeg: olnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Sg2+ConNeg: olnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Sg3+ConNeg: olnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Pl1+ConNeg: olnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Pl2+ConNeg: olnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Pl3+ConNeg: olnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+4+ConNeg:   oldud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Sg1+ConNeg: polnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Sg2+ConNeg: polnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Sg3+ConNeg: polnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Pl1+ConNeg: polnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Pl2+ConNeg: polnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+Pl3+ConNeg: polnud
    olema+V+Jus+Prt+4+ConNeg:   poldud
    #
    # Infinitive
    #
    olema+V+Inf: olla
    #
    # Supine
    #
    olema+V+Sup:        olema
    olema+V+Sup+Ill:    olema
    olema+V+Sup+Ine:    olemas
    olema+V+Sup+Ela:    olemast
    olema+V+Sup+Tra:    olemaks
    olema+V+Sup+VAbess: olemata
    # ? olema+V+Sup+4: oldama     
    #
    # Participle
    #
    olema+V+PrsPrc:   olev
    olema+V+PrsPrc+4: oldav
    olema+V+PrfPrc:   olnud
    olema+V+PrfPrc+4: oldud
    #
    # Gerund
    #
    olema+V+Ger: olles


# The verb forms list should be complete now
